Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 8 Burglary and Breaking and Entering

11-8-1.
Burglary.

Every person who shall commit burglary shall be imprisoned for life or for any term not less than five (5) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

11-8-1

.

11-8-1.1.
Attempted breaking and entering.

Whoever attempts to commit the breaking and entering of any structure as set out in §§

11-8-2

,

11-8-2.1

,

11-8-2

.2,

11-8-2.3

,

11-8-3

,

11-8-4

or

11-8-5.1

by doing any overt act toward the commission of the offense while in the curtilage of the structure, but fails in its perpetration, shall, unless otherwise provided, suffer the same punishment which might have been imposed if the attempted offense had been committed.

An “overt act” is defined as any act of an individual by which the individual physically attempts to gain entrance into a type of structure set forth in the sections listed in subsection (a) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 87, § 2.

11-8-2.
Unlawful breaking and entering of dwelling house.

Every person who shall break and enter at any time of the day or night any dwelling house or apartment, whether the dwelling house or apartment is occupied or not, or any outbuilding or garage attached to or adjoining any dwelling house, without the consent of the owner or tenant of the dwelling house, apartment, building, or garage, shall be imprisoned for not less than two (2) years and not more than ten (10) years for the first conviction, and for the second and subsequent conviction shall be imprisoned for not less than four (4) years and not more than fifteen (15) years, or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

Every person convicted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be ordered to make restitution to the victim of the offense or to perform up to five hundred (500) hours of public community restitution work, or both, or any combination of them approved by the sentencing judge. The court may not waive the obligation to make restitution and/or public community restitution work. The restitution and/or public community restitution work shall be in addition to any fine or sentence which may be imposed and not in lieu of the fine or sentence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 9; P.L. 1928, ch. 1209, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

11-8-2

; P.L. 1978, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 171, § 1.

11-8-2.1.
Unlawful breaking and entering of dwelling with possession of instruments relating to wrongful setting of fires.

Every person who shall break and enter, at any time of the day or night, any dwelling house or apartment, whether it is occupied or not, or any outbuilding or garage attached to or adjoining any dwelling house or apartment, without the consent of the owner or tenant of the dwelling house, apartment, building, or garage, and who shall have in his or her possession any instrument or instrumentality or equipment of any kind that is reasonably related to the wrongful setting of fires shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than three (3) years and not more than fifteen (15) years. “Possession” means in the actual or constructive control or custody of the person while in the dwelling. “Wrongful” excludes those items which are ordinarily used for the lighting of smoking paraphernalia.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 536, § 1.

11-8-2.2.
Breaking and entering of a dwelling when resident on premises.

Every person who shall break and enter into any dwelling house or apartment without the consent of the owner or tenant at a time when the resident or residents of the dwelling house or apartment are on the premises, after having been previously convicted of such an offense, shall be imprisoned for not less than one year and not more than ten (10) years and shall not be afforded the provisions of suspension or deferment of sentence nor probation and may in addition be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Every person convicted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be ordered to make restitution to the victim of the offense, or to perform up to five hundred (500) hours of public community restitution work, or both, or any combination of them approved by the sentencing judge. The court may not waive the obligation to make restitution and/or public community restitution work. Restitution and/or public community restitution work shall be in addition to any fine or sentence which may be imposed and not in lieu of the fine or sentence; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require the payment of restitution while the convicted person is imprisoned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 426, § 2.

11-8-2.3.
Breaking and entering of dwelling house of persons 60 years of age or older when resident on premises.

Every person who shall break and enter any dwelling house or apartment, without the consent of the owner or tenant at a time when a resident of the dwelling house or apartment who is sixty (60) years of age or older is on the premises, shall be imprisoned for not less than four (4) years and not more than twenty (20) years for the first conviction, and for the second and subsequent convictions shall be imprisoned for not less than six (6) years and not more than twenty (20) years, and may in addition be fined not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for a first conviction and not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for second and subsequent convictions.

Every person convicted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be ordered to make restitution to the victim of the offense, or to perform up to five hundred (500) hours of public community restitution work, or both, or any combination of them imposed by the sentencing judge. The court may not waive the obligation to make restitution and/or public community restitution work. Restitution and/or public community restitution work shall be in addition to any fine or sentence which may be imposed and not in lieu of the fine or sentence; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require the payment of restitution while the convicted person is imprisoned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 543, § 1.

11-8-2.4.
Breaking and entering of dwelling house of a person who is severely impaired.

Every person who shall break and enter any dwelling house or apartment, without the consent of the owner or tenant at a time when a resident of the dwelling house or apartment who is a person who is severely impaired as defined by the provisions of §

11-5-11

is on the premises, shall be imprisoned for not less than five (5) years and not more than twenty-five (25) years and may in addition be fined not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for a first conviction and not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for second and subsequent convictions.

Every person convicted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be ordered to make restitution to the victim of the offense, or to perform up to five hundred (500) hours of public community restitution work, or both, or any combination of them imposed by the sentencing judge. The court may not waive the obligation to make restitution and/or public community restitution work. Restitution and/or public community restitution work shall be in addition to any fine or sentence which may be imposed and not in lieu of the fine or sentence; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require the payment of restitution while the convicted person is imprisoned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 11; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 11; P.L. 2011, ch. 356, § 1.

11-8-3.
Entry of building or ship with felonious intent.

Every person who, with intent to commit murder, sexual assault, robbery, arson or larceny, shall enter any dwelling house or apartment at any time of the day or night, or who with such intent shall, during the daytime, enter any other building, or ship or vessel, shall be imprisoned not more than ten (10) years, or be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 9; P.L. 1922, ch. 2233, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 9; P.L. 1928, ch. 1209, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

11-8-3

; P.L. 1978, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 50, § 1.

11-8-4.
Breaking and entering business place, public building, or ship with felonious intent.

Every person who shall break and enter any bank, shop, office or warehouse, not adjoining to or occupied as a dwelling house, any meeting house, church, chapel, courthouse, town house, college, academy, schoolhouse, library or other building erected for public use or occupied for any public purpose, or any ship or vessel, with intent to commit murder, sexual assault, robbery or larceny, shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

11-8-4

; P.L. 1987, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 314, § 1.

11-8-5.
Breaking and entering other buildings with criminal intent — Railroad cars — Tractor trailers.

Every person who shall break and enter or enter in the nighttime, with intent to commit larceny or any felony or misdemeanor in it, any barn, stable, carriage house, or other building, for the breaking and entering or entering of which with that intent no punishment is otherwise prescribed by this title, and every person who shall at any time break and enter or enter any railroad car or the trailer portion of a tractor trailer or break any lock or seal on it with intent to commit larceny or other crime, shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 10; P.L. 1897, ch. 454, § 1; P.L. 1908, ch. 1568, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 10; P.L. 1922, ch. 2233, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

11-8-5

; P.L. 1987, ch. 533, § 1.

11-8-5.1.
Unlawful breaking and entering of business place, public building or ship during the daytime.

Every person who shall break and enter any bank, shop, office or warehouse, not adjoining to or occupied as a dwelling house, any meeting house, church, chapel, courthouse, town house, college, academy, schoolhouse, library, or other building erected for public use or occupied for any purpose, or any ship or vessel during the daytime, shall be imprisoned not more than three (3) years, or fined not more than three hundred dollars ($300), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 157, § 1.

11-8-6.
Entry to steal poultry — Arrest — Fine.

Every person who breaks and enters, or enters in the nighttime without breaking, any building or enclosure in which are kept or confined any kind of poultry, with intent to steal any of the poultry, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both. Every person who is discovered in the act of willfully entering any building or enclosure in which are kept or confined any kind of poultry, with intent to steal any of the poultry, may be arrested without a warrant by a deputy sheriff, town constable, guard, police officer, or other person and detained in jail or otherwise until a complaint can be made against him or her for the offense, and until he or she is taken on a warrant issued upon the complaint, but detention without a warrant shall not continue more than twenty-four (24) hours. One-half (1/2) of any fine imposed under this section shall inure to the complainant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 26; P.L. 1912, ch. 853, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

11-8-6

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 30; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 12; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 12.

11-8-7.
Making, repairing, or possessing burglar tools.

Whoever makes or mends, or does any work connected with the making or reparation of, or has in his or her possession any engine, machine, tool, false key, pick lock, nippers, or implement of any kind adapted and designed for cutting through, forcing, breaking open, or entering a building, room, vault, safe, or other depository, in order to steal from it money or other property, or to commit any other crime, knowing the equipment to be adapted and designed for this purpose, with intent to use or employ, or allow the equipment to be used or employed, for this purpose, shall be imprisoned not more than ten (10) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 302, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 42; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 42; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

11-8-7

.

11-8-8.
Injury or death — Defense.

In the event that any person shall die or shall sustain a personal injury in any way or for any cause while in the commission of any criminal offense enumerated in §§

11-8-2

—

11-8-6

, it shall be rebuttably presumed as a matter of law in any civil or criminal proceeding that the owner, tenant, or occupier of the place where the offense was committed acted by reasonable means in self-defense and in the reasonable belief that the person engaged in the criminal offense was about to inflict great bodily harm or death upon that person or any other individual lawfully in the place where the criminal offense was committed. There shall be no duty on the part of an owner, tenant, or occupier to retreat from any person engaged in the commission of any criminal offense enumerated in §§

11-8-2

—

11-8-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 212, § 1.

11-8-9.
Aiding and abetting a minor.

Every person eighteen (18) years of age or older who shall aid, assist, abet, counsel, hire, command, or procure a person under the age of eighteen (18) years to commit any offense as set forth in this chapter shall be imprisoned for not less than four (4) years and not more than twenty (20) years and/or fined not less than twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500) nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or both, for each such offense.

Every person convicted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be ordered by the sentencing judge to perform up to one hundred (100) hours of public community restitution work. The court may not waive the obligation to perform public community restitution work. Public community restitution work shall be in addition to any fine or sentence which may be imposed and not in lieu of the fine or sentence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 482, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 541, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 464, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 226, § 1.